Maine, session 132, LD411.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §3314, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. C, §50, is
further amended to read:
6. Forfeiture of firearms. As part of every disposition in every proceeding under this
code, every firearm that constitutes the basis for an adjudication for a juvenile crime that,
if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation of section 393; Title 17‑A, section
1105‑A, subsection 1, paragraph C‑1; Title 17‑A, section 1105‑B, subsection 1, paragraph
C; Title 17‑A, section 1105‑C, subsection 1, paragraph C‑1; Title 17‑A, section 1105‑D,
subsection 1, paragraph B‑1; or Title 17‑A, section 1118‑A, subsection 1, paragraph B and
every firearm used by the juvenile or any accomplice during the course of conduct for
which the juvenile has been adjudicated to have committed a juvenile crime that would
have been forfeited pursuant to Title 17‑A, section 1504 if the criminal conduct had been
committed by an adult must be forfeited to the State and the juvenile court shall so order
unless another person satisfies the court prior to the dispositional hearing and by a
preponderance of the evidence that the other person had a right to possess the firearm, to
the exclusion of the juvenile, at the time of the conduct that constitutes the juvenile crime,
was the rightful owner from whom the firearm had been stolen and the other person was
not a principal or accomplice in the commission of the juvenile crime. Rules adopted by
the Attorney General that govern the disposition of firearms forfeited pursuant to Title
17‑A, section 1504 govern forfeitures under this subsection.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §5826, sub-§5, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 421, §1, is
amended to read:
A. The Except as provided in Title 17-A, section 1504, subsection 2, paragraph B, the
petitioner has a legal right, title or interest in the property and the right, title or interest
renders the order of forfeiture invalid in whole or in part because the right, title or
interest was vested in the petitioner rather than in any defendant or was superior to any
right, title or interest to the exclusion of any defendant at the time of the commission
of the acts that gave rise to the forfeiture of the property under this section; or
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1504, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
amended to read:
2. Prohibited forfeiture. Except as provided in subsection 3, a A court may not order
the forfeiture of a firearm otherwise qualifying for forfeiture under subsection 1 if, prior to
the imposition of the person's sentence:
A. For a crime other than murder or any other unlawful homicide crime, another person
satisfies the court by a preponderance of the evidence that the other person, at the time
of the commission of the crime, had a right to possess the firearm to the exclusion of
the convicted person; or
B. For the crime of murder or any other unlawful homicide crime, another Another
person satisfies the court by a preponderance of the evidence that the other person, at
the time of the commission of the crime, was the rightful owner from whom the firearm
had been stolen and the other person was not a principal or accomplice in the
commission of the crime.
Page 1 - 132LR0868(01)

Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1504, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 5. 17-A MRSA §1504, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
amended to read:
4. Disposition of forfeited firearms. The Attorney General shall adopt rules
governing the disposition to state, county and municipal agencies of firearms forfeited
under this section. A firearm used during a murder or other unlawful homicide crime
forfeited under this section that does not meet the prohibition from forfeiture under
subsection 2, paragraph B must be destroyed by the State.
Sec. 6. Attorney General; rules for forfeited firearms. In accordance with the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 17-A, section 1504, subsection 4, the Attorney General shall
update rules governing the disposition of forfeited firearms to state, county and municipal
agencies including updated processes for the destruction of forfeited firearms under state
law.